District of Columbia statutes.
1-620.41

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Applicant” means an individual who has filed an application for employment with a public employer or who has filed an application or made a verbal request to serve in a volunteer position with a public employer.

(2)

“Covered position” means a position in which a criminal background check is required by law.

(3)

“Public employer” means the District government.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2041
as added Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-340, § 2(b), 58 DCR 621